Nebraska, session 109, LB871.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 8-1,131, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-1,131 (1) All banks are qualified to act as trustee or custodian
under the federal Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962,
as amended, or under the terms and provisions of section 408(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code, if the provisions of such retirement plan require
the funds of such trust or custodianship to be invested exclusively in
shares or accounts in the bank or in other banks. If any such retirement
plan, within the judgment of the bank, constitutes a qualified plan under
the federal Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962, or
under the terms and provisions of section 408(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code and the regulations promulgated thereunder at the time the trust was
established and accepted by the bank, and is subsequently determined not
to be such a qualified plan or subsequently ceases to be such a qualified
plan, in whole or in part, the bank may continue to act as trustee of any
deposits theretofore made under such plan and to dispose of the same in
accordance with the directions of the member and beneficiaries thereof.
No bank, in respect to savings made under this subsection, shall be
required to segregate such savings from other liabilities of the bank.
The bank shall keep appropriate records showing in proper detail all
transactions engaged in under the authority of this subsection.
(2)(a) All banks are qualified to act as trustee or custodian of a
medical savings account created within the provisions of section 220 of
the Internal Revenue Code and a health savings account created within the
provisions of section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code. If any such
medical savings account or health savings account, within the judgment of
the bank, constitutes a medical savings account under section 220 of the
Internal Revenue Code or a health savings account under section 223 of
the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations promulgated thereunder at
the time the trust was established and accepted by the bank, and is
subsequently determined not to be such a medical savings account or
-2-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
health savings account, in whole or in part, the bank may continue to act
as trustee of any deposits theretofore made under such plan and to
dispose of the same in accordance with the directions of the account
holder. No bank, in respect to savings made under this subsection, shall
be required to segregate such savings from other liabilities of the bank.
The bank shall keep appropriate records showing in proper detail all
transactions engaged in under the authority of this subsection.
(b) Except for judgments against the medical savings account holder
or health savings account holder or his or her dependents for qualified
medical expenses as defined under section 223(d)(2) of the Internal
Revenue Code, funds credited to a medical savings account or health
savings account below forty thousand eight hundred thirty-one twenty-five
thousand dollars are not susceptible to levy, execution, judgment, or
other operation of law, garnishment, or other judicial enforcement and
are not an asset or property of the account holder for purposes of
bankruptcy law.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall adjust the dollar limitation
provided for in this section every fifth year commencing July 1, 2030.
The adjusted limitation shall be equal to the then current limitation
adjusted by the cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, as prepared by the United States Department of
Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the five-year period preceding the
adjustment date. The adjusted limitation shall be rounded to the nearest
hundred-dollar amount.
Sec. 2. Section 25-1558, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1558 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of an individual
for any workweek which is subject to garnishment shall not exceed the
lesser of the following amounts:
(a) Twenty-five percent of his or her disposable earnings for that
-3-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
week;
(b) The amount by which his or her disposable earnings for that week
exceed thirty times the minimum wage rate as prescribed by section
48-1203 federal minimum hourly wage prescribed by 29 U.S.C. 206(a)(1) in
effect at the time earnings are payable; or
(c) Fifteen percent of his or her disposable earnings for that week,
if the individual is a head of a family.
(2) The restrictions of subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply in the case of:
(a) Any order of any court for the support of any persons;
(b) Any order of any court of bankruptcy under Chapter XIII of the
Bankruptcy Act; or
(c) Any debt due for any state or federal tax.
(3) No court shall make, execute, or enforce any order or process in
violation of this section. The exemptions allowed in this section shall
be granted to any person so entitled without any further proceedings.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) Earnings shall mean compensation paid or payable by an employer
to an employee for personal services, whether denominated as wages,
salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and includes periodic payments
pursuant to a pension or retirement program;
(b) Disposable earnings shall mean that part of the earnings of any
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amounts required by law to be withheld;
(c) Garnishment shall mean any legal or equitable procedure through
which the earnings of any individual are required to be withheld for
payment of any debt; and
(d) Head of a family shall mean an individual who actually supports
and maintains one or more individuals who are closely connected with him
or her by blood relationship, relationship by marriage, by adoption, or
by guardianship, and whose right to exercise family control and provide
-4-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
for the dependent individuals is based upon some moral or legal
obligation.
(5) Every assignment, sale, transfer, pledge, or mortgage of the
wages or salary of an individual which is exempted by this section, to
the extent of the exemption provided by this section, shall be void and
unenforceable by any process of law.
(6) No employer shall discharge any employee by reason of the fact
that his or her earnings have been subjected to garnishment for any one
indebtedness.
(7) In the case of earnings for any pay period other than a week,
the Commissioner of Labor shall by regulation prescribe a multiple of the
minimum wage rate as prescribed by section 48-1203 that is federal
minimum hourly wage equivalent in effect to that set forth in this
section.
Sec. 3. Section 25-1559, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1559 (1) In addition to the exemptions otherwise provided for,
there shall also be exempt from levy and sale upon execution or
attachment, to every resident of the State of Nebraska, who became
disabled in the service of the United States as a soldier, sailor or
marine, all pension money hereafter received and all property hereafter
purchased and improved exclusively therewith, not exceeding sixty-four
thousand eight hundred thirty two thousand dollars in value, of and
belonging to such soldier, sailor or marine.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall adjust the dollar limitation
provided for in this section every fifth year commencing July 1, 2030.
The adjusted limitation shall be equal to the then current limitation
adjusted by the cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, as prepared by the United States Department of
Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the five-year period preceding the
adjustment date. The adjusted limitation shall be rounded to the nearest
-5-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
hundred-dollar amount.
Sec. 4. Section 30-2322, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2322 (1) A surviving spouse of a decedent who was domiciled in
this state is entitled to a homestead allowance of seven thousand five
hundred dollars for a decedent who dies before January 1, 2011, and
twenty thousand dollars for a decedent who dies before December 31, 2027,
and twenty-nine thousand one hundred forty-two dollars for a decedent who
dies on or after January 1, 2027 on or after January 1, 2011. If there is
no surviving spouse, each minor child and each dependent child of the
decedent is entitled to a homestead allowance amounting to the amount
allowed for a surviving spouse divided by the number of minor and
dependent children of the decedent. The homestead allowance is exempt
from and has priority over all claims against the estate except for costs
and expenses of administration. Homestead allowance is in addition to any
share passing to the surviving spouse or minor or dependent child by the
will of the decedent unless otherwise provided therein, by intestate
succession or by way of elective share.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall adjust the dollar limitation
provided for in this section every fifth year commencing July 1, 2030.
The adjusted limitation shall be equal to the then current limitation
adjusted by the cumulative percentage change in the Housing Price Index
for Nebraska, as prepared by the Federal Housing Finance Agency, for the
five-year period preceding the adjustment date. The adjusted limitation
shall be rounded to the nearest hundred-dollar amount.
Sec. 5. Section 30-2323, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2323 (1)(a) (1) In addition to the homestead allowance, the
surviving spouse of a decedent who was domiciled in this state is
entitled from the estate to value not exceeding five thousand dollars for
a decedent who dies before January 1, 2011, and twelve thousand five
-6-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
hundred dollars for a decedent who dies before December 31, 2027, and
eighteen thousand two hundred fourteen dollars for a decedent who dies on
or after January 1, 2027 on or after January 1, 2011, in excess of any
security interests therein in household furniture, automobiles,
furnishings, appliances, and personal effects. If there is no surviving
spouse, children of the decedent are entitled jointly to the same value
unless the decedent has provided in his or her will that one or more of
such children shall be disinherited, in which case only those children
not so disinherited shall be so entitled. For purposes of this section,
disinherited means providing in one's will that a child shall take
nothing or a nominal amount of ten dollars or less from the estate.
(b) The Department of Revenue shall adjust the dollar limitation
provided for in this section every fifth year commencing July 1, 2030.
The adjusted limitation shall be equal to the then current limitation
adjusted by the cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, as prepared by the United States Department of
Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the five-year period preceding the
adjustment date. The adjusted limitation shall be rounded to the nearest
hundred-dollar amount.
(2) If encumbered chattels are selected and if the value in excess
of security interests, plus that of other exempt property, is less than
the amount allowed under subsection (1) of this section, or if there is
not that amount worth of exempt property in the estate, the spouse or
children are entitled to other assets of the estate, if any, to the
extent necessary to make up the amount allowed under subsection (1) of
this section. Rights to exempt property and assets needed to make up a
deficiency of exempt property have priority over all claims against the
estate except for costs and expenses of administration, except for claims
filed by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section
68-919 notwithstanding the order of payment established in section
30-2487, and except that the right to any assets to make up a deficiency
-7-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
of exempt property shall abate as necessary to permit prior payment of
homestead allowance and family allowance.
(3) These rights are in addition to any benefit or share passing to
the surviving spouse by the will of the decedent unless otherwise
provided therein, by intestate succession, or by way of elective share.
These rights are in addition to any benefit or share passing to the
surviving children by intestate succession and are in addition to any
benefit or share passing by the will of the decedent to those surviving
children not disinherited unless otherwise provided in the will.
Sec. 6. Section 40-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
40-101 (1) Each natural person residing in this state shall have
exempt from judgment liens and from execution or forced sale, except as
provided in sections 40-101 to 40-116, a homestead not exceeding two
hundred twenty-eight thousand one hundred forty-eight one hundred twenty
thousand dollars in value consisting of the dwelling house in which the
claimant resides, its appurtenances, and the land on which the same is
situated, not exceeding one hundred and sixty acres of land, to be
selected by the owner, and not in any incorporated city or village, or,
at the option of the claimant, a quantity of contiguous land not
exceeding two lots within any incorporated city or village.
(2)(a) The Department of Revenue shall adjust the dollar limitation
provided for in this section every fifth year commencing July 1, 2030, to
reflect the statewide average residential value for single-family
residential properties. The statewide average residential value for
single-family residential properties shall be determined by dividing the
total statewide residential value for single-family properties by the
number of single-family residential properties in the state.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, total statewide residential
value for single-family properties means the sum of the total residential
values for single-family residential properties for each county.
-8-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
(c) The total residential value for single-family properties for
each county and the number of single-family residential properties shall
be determined by using the values certified to the Department of Revenue
pursuant to section 77-3506.02.
Sec. 7. Section 44-371, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-371 (1)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of this
section and in section 68-919, all proceeds, cash values, and benefits
accruing under any annuity contract, under any policy or certificate of
life insurance payable upon the death of the insured to a beneficiary
other than the estate of the insured, or under any accident or health
insurance policy shall be exempt from attachment, garnishment, or other
legal or equitable process and from all claims of creditors of the
insured and of the beneficiary if related to the insured by blood or
marriage, unless a written assignment to the contrary has been obtained
by the claimant.
(b) Subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall not apply to:
(i) An individual's aggregate interests greater than one hundred
twenty-nine thousand eight hundred three one hundred thousand dollars in
all loan values or cash values of all matured or unmatured life insurance
contracts and in all proceeds, cash values, or benefits accruing under
all annuity contracts owned by such individual; and
(ii) An individual's interest in all loan values or cash values of
all matured or unmatured life insurance contracts and in all proceeds,
cash values, or benefits accruing under all annuity contracts owned by
such individual, to the extent that the loan values or cash values of any
matured or unmatured life insurance contract or the proceeds, cash
values, or benefits accruing under any annuity contract were established
or increased through contributions, premiums, or any other payments made
within three years prior to bankruptcy or within three years prior to
entry against the individual of a money judgment which thereafter becomes
-9-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
final.
(c) An insurance company shall not be liable or responsible to any
person to determine or ascertain the existence or identity of any such
creditors prior to payment of any such loan values, cash values,
proceeds, or benefits.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall adjust the dollar limitation
provided for in subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section every fifth year
commencing July 1, 2030. The adjusted limitation shall be equal to the
then current limitation adjusted by the cumulative percentage change in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as prepared by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the
five-year period preceding the adjustment date. The adjusted limitation
shall be rounded to the nearest hundred-dollar amount.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, proceeds, cash
values, and benefits accruing under any annuity contract or under any
policy or certificate of life insurance payable upon the death of the
insured to a beneficiary other than the estate of the insured shall not
be exempt from attachment, garnishment, or other legal or equitable
process by a judgment creditor of the beneficiary if the judgment against
the beneficiary was based on, arose from, or was related to an act,
transaction, or course of conduct for which the beneficiary has been
convicted by any court of a crime punishable only by life imprisonment or
death. No insurance company shall be liable or responsible to any person
to determine or ascertain the existence or identity of any such judgment
creditor prior to payment of any such proceeds, cash values, or benefits.
This subsection shall apply to any judgment rendered on or after January
1, 1995, irrespective of when the criminal conviction is or was rendered
and irrespective of whether proceedings for attachment, garnishment, or
other legal or equitable process were pending on March 14, 1997.
Sec. 8. Section 44-1089, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-10-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
44-1089 (1) No noninsurance benefit, charity, relief, or aid to be
paid, provided, or rendered by any society shall be liable to attachment,
garnishment, or other process, or to be seized, taken, appropriated, or
applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law to pay any
debt or liability of a member or beneficiary, or any other person who may
have a right thereunder, either before or after payment by the society.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, all
proceeds, cash values, and benefits accruing under any annuity contract,
under any policy or certificate of life insurance payable upon the death
of the insured to a beneficiary other than the estate of the insured, or
under any accident or health insurance policy shall be exempt from
attachment, garnishment, or other legal or equitable process and from all
claims of creditors of the insured and of the beneficiary if related to
the insured by blood or marriage, unless a written assignment to the
contrary has been obtained by the claimant.
(b) Subdivision (2)(a) of this section shall not apply to:
(i) An individual's aggregate interests greater than one hundred
sixty-three thousand three hundred twenty-six one hundred thousand
dollars in all loan values or cash values of all matured or unmatured
life insurance contracts and in all proceeds, cash values, or benefits
accruing under all annuity contracts owned by such individual; and
(ii) An individual's interest in all loan values or cash values of
all matured or unmatured life insurance contracts and in all proceeds,
cash values, or benefits accruing under all annuity contracts owned by
such individual, to the extent that the loan values or cash values of any
matured or unmatured life insurance contract or the proceeds, cash
values, or benefits accruing under any annuity contract were established
or increased through contributions, premiums, or any other payments made
within three years prior to bankruptcy or within three years prior to
entry against the individual of a money judgment which thereafter becomes
final.
-11-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
(c) A fraternal benefit society shall not be liable or responsible
to any person to determine or ascertain the existence or identity of any
such creditors prior to payment of any such loan values, cash values,
proceeds, or benefits.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall adjust the dollar limitation
provided for in subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section every fifth year
commencing July 1, 2030. The adjusted limitation shall be equal to the
then current limitation adjusted by the cumulative percentage change in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as prepared by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the
five-year period preceding the adjustment date. The adjusted limitation
shall be rounded to the nearest hundred-dollar amount.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, proceeds, cash
values, and benefits accruing under any annuity contract or under any
policy or certificate of life insurance payable upon the death of the
insured to a beneficiary other than the estate of the insured shall not
be exempt from attachment, garnishment, or other legal or equitable
process by a judgment creditor of the beneficiary if the judgment against
the beneficiary was based on, arose from, or was related to an act,
transaction, or course of conduct for which the beneficiary has been
convicted by any court of a crime punishable only by life imprisonment or
death. No fraternal benefit society shall be liable or responsible to any
person to determine or ascertain the existence or identity of any such
judgment creditor prior to payment of any such proceeds, cash values, or
benefits. This subsection shall apply to any judgment rendered on or
after January 1, 1995, irrespective of when the criminal conviction is or
was rendered and irrespective of whether proceedings for attachment,
garnishment, or other legal or equitable process were pending on March
14, 1997.
Sec. 9. Original sections 8-1,131, 25-1558, 25-1559, 30-2322,
30-2323, 44-371, and 44-1089, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
-12-

LB871 LB871
2026 2026
section 40-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-13-